Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 21
OFFICE OF ACTIVE AND INACTIVE MINES

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 2 of chapter 92, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1988, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1988, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. sections are shown in editors' notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 34-20-102.

Section

34-21-101. Office of active and inactive mines - creation - duties.

There is created in the division of reclamation, mining, and safety in the department of natural resources the office of active and inactive mines, the head of which is appointed by the director of the division. The office of active and inactive mines is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department of natural resources. The office has the following duties:

To assist, upon request, operators and miners in meeting the requirements of the "Federal Mine Safety and Health Act of 1977", Pub.L. 95-164, as amended;

To assist, upon request, operators in establishing, training, equipping, and coordinating mine rescue teams;

To maintain state miner training and accident reduction programs as deemed necessary by the commissioner and to provide such programs to operators and miners when requested;

To secure funding for state and local training, technical assistance, and technology improvement programs;

Through the board, to examine applicants for positions for which certification is required by federal law and to issue certificates of competence to those applicants who qualify;

To provide for permitting of underground diesel-powered equipment and for permitting the storage and use of explosives until a federal permit is required by law;

To be a repository for mine information and maps, to collect mine data and records, and to preserve information regarding the history and progress of the mining industry in the state from the earliest date to the present time;

To respond to operators' or coroners' requests for assistance in investigating injuries and accidents;

To provide administration and clerical support for the commissioners, the director, and the board;

To prepare an annual report on the mining industry in Colorado providing information on production, employment, safety, ownership, processing and distribution, location, type, and any other information necessary to guide and promote mining in the state;

To cooperate with and utilize the Colorado geological survey, consistent with its duties in sections 23-41-203 and 23-41-205, C.R.S.;

To cooperate with other state agencies and institutions in the implementation of articles 1, 21, 22, 23, 24, 32, and 33 of this title;

To develop and administer the abandoned mine reclamation program consistent with the provisions of section 34-33-133; and

To perform such other duties as specified in articles 22 to 24 and article 32 of this title.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1186, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

IP(1), (1)(e), and (1)(l) amended and (1)(l.1) added, p. 1931, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(m) amended, p. 1198, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

IP(1) amended, p. 216, § 10, effective August 7.

L. 2012:

(1)(k) amended, (HB 12-1355), ch. 247, p. 1197, § 6, effective January 31, 2013.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3409, § 162, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-101 as it existed prior to 1988.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

34-21-102. Commissioner of mines.

In accordance with the provisions of section 1 of article XVI of the Colorado constitution, it is the duty of the governor, with the consent of the senate, to appoint a person known to be competent to the office of commissioner, who may also be the executive director of the department of natural resources. The office of commissioner of mines shall be located in the office of the executive director of the department of natural resources. The governor has the power to remove said commissioner from office for incompetency, neglect of duty, or abuse of the privileges of such commissioner's office.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 1931, § 13, effective July 1, 1992.)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1187, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1931, § 13, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-103 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-21-103. Head of office of active and inactive mines - appointment - staff.

The director shall, subject to the provisions of section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, appoint the head of the office of active and inactive mines, subject to the supervision and control of the director. The head of the office of active and inactive mines shall have knowledge of mine health and safety practices, an understanding of mining technologies, and reclamation practices.

The director may hire such competent persons, including authorized representatives, as the director deems necessary and proper for carrying out the purposes of articles 20 to 24, 32, and 33 of this title, and such persons shall comprise the office staff.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1187, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1931, § 14, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-103 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-21-104. Rules and regulations.

The director may, subject to the supervision and control of the commissioner, promulgate rules and regulations which shall be in accordance with the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to carry out the provisions of articles 20 to 24 of this title and shall enforce the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder in the same manner as he enforces the provisions of such articles. In the promulgation of such rules and regulations, the director shall consult with representatives of operators and miners.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1187, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-103 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-21-105. Conflicts of interest.

The commissioner, director, division staff, and office staff shall devote their entire time and attention to the duties of their offices. Neither the commissioner, the director, nor any member of the office staff, shall be an owner, operator, employee, controlling stockholder, or director of any producing mine, nor shall any such person act as manager, agent, or lessee for any mining corporation or act as an active member, officer, or employee of any labor union or organization representing miners during the term of such person's office.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1187, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1932, § 15, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-110 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-21-106. Officers not to reveal information - penalty.

Information obtained by the commissioner, director, and office staff, including authorized representatives, which pertains to mine and metallurgical processes, ore bodies, or deposits or to the location, course, or character of underground workings and which is stamped confidential shall remain confidential, except in the way of official reports filed for record in accordance with the requirements of articles 20 to 25 of this title, and no information shall be furnished with the intent to aid in or prevent the sale or other conveyance of any mine or mining property.

Any person who violates the requirements of this section is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. In addition, the person so convicted shall be removed from his position.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1188, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1932, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-114 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-21-107. Salaries of commissioner and division employees.

The commissioner shall receive a salary as provided by law. Employees of the division shall receive for their services salaries to be paid as other officers and employees of the state are paid, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1188, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-116 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-21-108. Report of director.

The director shall report to the executive director of the department of natural resources at such times and on such matters as the executive director requires.

The director is authorized to make researches and studies as appropriations may be made therefor and as he deems necessary to the mining industry in the state, but the researches and studies shall not duplicate the work of other state and federal agencies.

Materials prepared under the authority of this section or any other materials of the office of active and inactive mines of the state of Colorado circulated in quantity outside the department shall be issued subject to the approval and control of the executive director of the department of natural resources.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1188, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1791, § 83, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-40-111 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-21-109. Code of signals.

There shall be established by the commissioner a uniform code of signals, embracing those most generally in use in metalliferous mines, which shall be adopted in all mines using hoisting machinery. The code of signals shall be securely posted, in clear and legible form, in the engine room, at the collar of the shaft, and at each level or station. In all shafts equipped with cages, such shafts and cages shall be fully equipped with a system of electric signals from such cages and stations to the engineer wherever possible.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1188, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-47-109 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-21-110. Tourist mines.

The office shall have the authority to inspect tourist mines in the state. In those cases where the public health and safety may be in danger, the office may close such mine until modification recommendations made by the office have been made. Where appropriate, such actions shall be made in consultation with the passenger tramway safety board.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1188, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1932, § 17, effective July 1.